Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 42. Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

Administrative Code. —

For transportation and public facilities, see 17 AAC.

For local control of state public works projects, see 17 AAC 55.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 1 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Highways, § 1 et seq.